New York, session 2025-2026, A5597.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (n) of subdivision 3 of section 265.01-e of the 2 penal law, as added by section 1 of part F of chapter 55 of the laws of 3 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 (n) persons not otherwise listed under this subdivision while partic- 5 ipating in military ceremonies, funerals, and honor guards, including 6 but not limited to, a formal ceremony including a twenty-one gun salute, 7 and/or any other formal ceremony honoring a person or persons who served 8 their municipality, state, and/or country in an official capacity, 9 provided, however, that such persons obtain prior approval from either: 10 (i) the municipality in which such ceremony will occur; or 11 (ii) the military, law enforcement, or fire prevention organization 12 hosting such ceremony; or 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09857-01-5